Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Reinstatement

17-16-1535.
Reinstatement following revocation of certificate of authority.

An officer or other person with proper authority at the time a foreign corporation had its certificate of authority revoked under W.S.

17-16-1531

may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement of its certificate of authority within two (2) years after the effective date of revocation. Reinstatement may be denied by the secretary of state if the corporation has been the subject of a secretary of state and law enforcement investigation pertaining to fraud or any other violation of state or federal law, or if there is other reason to believe the corporation was engaged in illegal operations. The application shall:

Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of the revocation of its certificate of authority;

State that the ground or grounds for revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated;

Reserved;

If the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority was revoked for failing to deliver its annual report or pay the annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1630

, include payment of fees and taxes then delinquent and a reinstatement certificate fee prescribed pursuant to W.S.

17-16-122

;

If the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority was revoked for failure to maintain a registered agent, include payment of a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) reinstatement fee and payment of any fees and taxes then delinquent; and

Include proof that the foreign corporation is currently in good standing in the state of formation.

If the secretary of state determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct, he shall cancel the certificate of revocation and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites his determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the revocation of the certificate of authority and the foreign corporation resumes carrying on its business as if the revocation had never occurred.

The foreign corporation shall retain its registered corporate name during the two (2) year reinstatement period.

If more than two (2) years has elapsed since the revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority, the foreign corporation may reapply for a certificate of authority to transact business pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1503

. If the foreign corporation continues transacting business in Wyoming after the two (2) year period elapsed, the foreign corporation shall be subject to the penalty for transacting business without authority as set forth in W.S. 17-16-1502(d).

A person who files any document under this section without proper corporate authority to do so is in violation of W.S.

6-5-308

.

History.

2015 ch. 156, § 1, effective January 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 156, § 1 makes the act effective January 1, 2016.

§ 17-16-1536.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the secretary of state denies a foreign corporation’s application for reinstatement following administrative revocation, he shall serve the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The foreign corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The foreign corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state’s certificate of revocation, the foreign corporation’s application for reinstatement and the secretary of state’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

2015 ch. 156, § 1, effective January 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 156, § 1 makes the act effective January 1, 2016.